Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.340

Preliminary examination—Commitment.

If from the examination before the judge or magistrate it appears that the person held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and, except in cases arising under RCW 10.88.250, that he or she has fled from justice, the judge or magistrate must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him or her to the county jail for such a time not exceeding thirty days and specified in the warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in RCW 10.88.350, or until he or she shall be legally discharged.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1077; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 15.]